Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5152
Securities Valuation Office; designated obligations; limitation.

(1) In addition to investments otherwise authorized under the Insurers Investment Act and subject to the limitations in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, an insurer may invest in obligations having 3, 4, 5, and 6 designations from the Securities Valuation Office.

(2) Subject to the limitation in subsection (3) of this section, an insurer shall not acquire, directly or indirectly through an investment subsidiary, investments in obligations:

(a) Having a 4 designation from the Securities Valuation Office if, as a result of and giving effect to the investment, the aggregate amount of such investments would exceed four percent of the insurer's admitted assets;

(b) Having a 5 designation from the Securities Valuation Office if, as a result of and giving effect to the investment, the aggregate amount of such investments would exceed two percent of the insurer's admitted assets; and

(c) Having a 6 designation from the Securities Valuation Office if, as a result of and giving effect to the investment, the aggregate amount of such investments would exceed one percent of the insurer's admitted assets.

(3) An insurer shall not acquire, directly or indirectly through an investment subsidiary, investments under this section if, as a result of and giving effect to the investment, the aggregate amount would exceed fifteen percent of the insurer's admitted assets.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 52;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 24;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 19.